Arkansas, session 2025, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-1-604(e), concerning the exemption for a
person engaged in home digital asset mining or operating a digital asset
mining business under the Uniform Money Services Act, is repealed.
(e) A person that is engaged in home digital asset mining or that has
a digital asset mining business shall not be considered a money transmitter
under the Uniform Money Services Act, § 23-55-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-55-102(13)(A), concerning the definition
of "money transmission" under the Uniform Money Services Act, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(v) engaging in home digital asset mining or
operating a digital asset mining business under the Arkansas Data Centers Act
of 2023, § 14-1-601 et seq.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. A person engaging in home digital asset
mining or operating a digital asset mining business under the Arkansas Data
*ANS078*
12/13/2024 2:08:04 PM ANS078

SB11
Centers Act of 2023, § 14-1-601 et seq., as of the effective date of this act
shall apply for licensure under the Uniform Money Services Act, § 23-55-101
et seq., on or before September 1, 2026.

































12/13/2024 2:08:04 PM